District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.31

Definitions.

For the purpose of this part, the term:

(1)

“New Convention Center Hotel Site” means the real property located in Lot 26 (formerly known as Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845), Square 370, bounded by 9th Street, N.W., 10th Street, N.W., L Street, N.W., and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C., and public alleys to be closed.

(2)

“New Convention Center” means the comprehensive international trade and exhibition center constructed within the area bounded by 7th Street, N.W., N Street, N.W., 9th Street, N.W., and Mount Vernon Square, N.W., Washington, D.C.

(3)

“New Convention Center Hotel” means a hotel to be constructed on the New Convention Center Hotel Site.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 231, formerly § 801
as added Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 201, 53 DCR 5430
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 3(f), 55 DCR 2527
renumbered Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 122(g), 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78, § 2(h), 56 DCR 6959
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 73(a), 59 DCR 6190
D.C. Law 17-144 rewrote par. (1); and, in par. (3), substituted “New Convention Center Hotel Site” for “New Convention Hotel Site”. Prior to amendment, par. (1) read as follows: “(1) ‘New Convention Center Hotel Site’ means square 370, bounded by 9th Street, N.W., 10th Street, N.W., M Street, N.W., and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C., and lots 801 through 805, 40, 838, 839, 62, 65 through 67, 842, 848, 859, and 878, and square 369, bounded by M Street, N.W., 9th Street, N.W., L Street, N.W., and 10th Street, N.W., Washington, D.C., and public alleys to be closed.”
D.C. Law 17-353, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 801 to § 231.
D.C. Law 18-78, in par. (1), substituted “Lot 26 (formerly known as Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845), Square 370” for “Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845, Square 370”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-78 which did not affect this section as codified.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).